src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-plex_stivah_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup


Tests:

  Noun - stihá: # MLO, ok
    stiváh+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#puuvsah+N+Pl+Nom: stihápuuvsah
    stiváh+N+Pl+Nom: stiváh
    stiváh+N+Pl+Gen: stivái
    stiváh+N+Pl+Acc: stiváid
    stiváh+N+Pl+Ill: stivváid
    stiváh+N+Pl+Loc: stiváin
    stiváh+N+Pl+Com: [stiváiguin, stiváigijn]
    stiváh+N+Pl+Abe: stiváittáá
